Utah statutes.
41-6a-1115.    Motor assisted scooters -- Conflicting provisions -- Restrictions -- Penalties.

(1) (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, a motor assisted scooter is subject to the provisions under this chapter for a bicycle, moped, or a motor-driven cycle.

(b)  For a person operating a motor assisted scooter, the following provisions do not apply:

(i)  seating positions under Section 41-6a-1501;

(ii)  required lights, horns, and mirrors under Section 41-6a-1506;

(iii)  entitlement to full use of a lane under Subsection 41-6a-1502(1); and

(iv)  driver licensing requirements under Section 53-3-202.

(2)  A person under 15 years of age may not operate a motor assisted scooter using the motor unless the person is under the direct supervision of the person's parent or guardian.

(3)  A person under eight years of age may not operate a motor assisted scooter with the motor running on any public property, highway, path, or sidewalk.

(4)  A person may not operate a motor assisted scooter:

(a)  in a public parking structure;

(b)  on public property posted as an area prohibiting skateboards;

(c)  on a highway consisting of a total of four or more lanes designated for regular vehicular traffic;

(d)  on a highway with a posted speed limit greater than 25 miles per hour;

(e)  while carrying more persons at one time than the number for which it is designed; or

(f)  that has been structurally or mechanically altered from the original manufacturer's design.

(5)  Except where posted or prohibited by local ordinance, a motor assisted scooter is considered a nonmotorized vehicle if it is being used with the motor turned off.

(6)  An owner may not authorize or knowingly permit a person to operate a motor assisted scooter in violation of this section.

(7)  A person who violates this section is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

